Washington statutes.
RCW 27.24.068

Establishment of county law library—Trustee—Free use of library.

In each county with a population of less than eight thousand, there may be a county law library which shall be governed and maintained by the prosecuting attorney who shall also serve as trustee of such library without additional salary or other compensation.

The use of the county law library shall be free to the judges of the state, to state and county officials, and to members of the bar, and to such others as the prosecuting attorney may by rule provide.

[ 1991 c 363 s 19; 1975 c 37 s 1.]

NOTES:

Purpose—Captions not law—1991 c 363: See notes following RCW 2.32.180.